Illinois, session 104th, HB4485.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-117 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-117)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-117)7    Sec. 6-117. Records to be kept by the Secretary of State. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall file every application 9for a license or permit accepted under this Chapter, and shall 10maintain suitable indexes thereof. The records of the 11Secretary of State shall indicate the action taken with 12respect to such applications.13    (b) The Secretary of State shall maintain appropriate 14records of all licenses and permits refused, cancelled, 15disqualified, revoked, or suspended and of the revocation, 16suspension, and disqualification of driving privileges of 17persons not licensed under this Chapter, and such records 18shall note the reasons for such action.19    (c) The Secretary of State shall maintain appropriate 20records of convictions reported under this Chapter. Records of 21conviction may be maintained in a computer processible medium.22    (d) The Secretary of State may also maintain appropriate 23records of any crash reports received.  HB4485- 2 -LRB104 17538 LNS 30966 b1    (e) The Secretary of State shall also maintain appropriate 2records of any disposition of supervision or records relative 3to a driver's referral to a driver remedial or rehabilitative 4program, as required by the Secretary of State or the courts. 5Such records shall only be available for use by the Secretary, 6the driver licensing administrator of any other state, law 7enforcement agencies, the courts, and the affected driver or, 8upon proper verification, such affected driver's attorney.9    (f) The Secretary of State shall also maintain or contract 10to maintain appropriate records of all photographs and 11signatures obtained in the process of issuing any driver's 12license, permit, or identification card. The record shall be 13confidential and shall not be disclosed except to those 14entities listed under Section 6-110.1 of this Code.15    (g) The Secretary of State may establish a First Person 16Consent organ and tissue donor registry in compliance with 17subsection (b-1) of Section 5-20 of the Illinois Anatomical 18Gift Act, as follows:19        (1) Each applicant for issuance or renewal of a 20    driver's license or identification card who is 16 years of 21    age or older shall have his or her name included in the 22    First Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry. The 23    Secretary shall offer, to each applicant for issuance or 24    renewal of a driver's license or identification card who 25    is 16 years of age or older, the opportunity to have his or 26    her name removed from included in the First Person Consent   HB4485- 3 -LRB104 17538 LNS 30966 b1    organ and tissue donor registry. The Secretary must advise 2    the applicant or licensee that he or she is under no 3    compulsion to have his or her name included in the 4    registry. An individual who agrees to having his or her 5    name remain on included in the First Person Consent organ 6    and tissue donor registry has given full legal consent to 7    the donation of any of his or her organs or tissue upon his 8    or her death. A brochure explaining this method of 9    executing an anatomical gift must be given to each 10    applicant for issuance or renewal of a driver's license or 11    identification card. The brochure must advise the 12    applicant or licensee (i) that he or she is under no 13    compulsion to have his or her name included in this 14    registry and (ii) that he or she may wish to consult with 15    family, friends, or clergy before doing so.16        (2) The Secretary of State may establish additional 17    methods by which an individual may have his or her name 18    included in or removed from the First Person Consent organ 19    and tissue donor registry.20        (3) When an individual has agreed to have his or her 21    name included in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 22    donor registry, the Secretary of State shall note that 23    agreement in the First Person consent organ and tissue 24    donor registry. Representatives of federally designated 25    organ procurement agencies and tissue banks and the 26    offices of Illinois county coroners and medical examiners   HB4485- 4 -LRB104 17538 LNS 30966 b1    may inquire of the Secretary of State whether a potential 2    organ donor's name is included in the First Person Consent 3    organ and tissue donor registry, and the Secretary of 4    State may provide that information to the representative.5        (4) An individual may withdraw his or her consent to 6    be listed in the First Person Consent organ and tissue 7    donor registry maintained by the Secretary of State by 8    notifying the Secretary of State in writing, or by any 9    other means approved by the Secretary, of the individual's 10    decision to have his or her name removed from the 11    registry.12        (5) The Secretary of State may undertake additional 13    efforts, including education and awareness activities, to 14    promote organ and tissue donation.15        (6) In the absence of gross negligence or willful 16    misconduct, the Secretary of State and his or her 17    employees are immune from any civil or criminal liability 18    in connection with an individual's consent to be listed in 19    the organ and tissue donor registry. 20    (h) The Secretary of State may destroy a driving record 21created 20 or more years ago for a person who was convicted of 22an offense and who did not have an Illinois driver's license if 23the record no longer contains any convictions or withdrawal of 24driving privileges due to the convictions. 25(Source: P.A. 104-260, eff. 8-15-25.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB4485- 5 -LRB104 17538 LNS 30966 b1becoming law.